Maryland, session 2025, HB0699.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
1–109.1.
(a) With respect to any State program of benefits, rights, or privileges applicable
to a veteran under this Code, “honorable discharge” includes discharge that is less than
honorable:
(1) solely due to the sexual orientation or gender identity of the individual
being discharged; [or]
(2) based on a statement or consensual act of the individual being
discharged related to the individual’s sexual orientation or gender identity, if the statement
or consensual act was prohibited by the military or naval service at the time of discharge;
OR
(3) BASED ON AN INCIDENT OR INCIDENTS RELATING TO:
(I) A DIAGNOSIS OF POST–TRAUMATIC STRESS DISORDER OR
TRAUMATIC BRAIN INJURY MADE BY AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED TO PROVIDE HEALTH
CARE SERVICES AT A U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS FACILITY; OR
(II) AN EXPERIENCE OF SEXUAL TRAUMA, AS DESCRIBED IN 38
U.S.C. § 1720, DISCLOSED TO AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED TO PROVIDE HEALTH CARE
SERVICES AT A U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS FACILITY.
– 1 –

Ch. 270 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) IF THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES
DETERMINES A DISCHARGE SHOULD BE UPGRADED AN INDIVIDUAL IS ELIGIBLE FOR
STATE BENEFITS BASED ON THE CRITERIA ESTABLISHED IN 38 C.F.R. § 3.12.
(b) A veteran shall submit to the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families
documentation that provides the basis for the veteran’s discharge.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –